Hawaii statutes.
§92-31 Disposition of original record.
A photograph, microphotograph, reproduction on film, or electronic form of a
government record shall be placed in conveniently accessible files and
provisions made for preserving, examining, and using the same. Thereafter, a
public officer, after having first received the written approval of the
comptroller as provided in section 94-3, may cause such record, paper, or
document to be destroyed. The comptroller may require, as a prerequisite to
the granting of such approval, that a reproduction or print of such photograph,
microphotograph, or reproduction on film, or electronic form of the record be
delivered into the custody of the public archives for safekeeping. The
comptroller may also require the delivery into the custody of another
governmental department or agency or a research library of any such record,
paper, or document proposed to be destroyed under the provisions of this
section. [L 1945, c 26, pt of §1; RL 1955, §7-7; am L 1959, c 7, §1; am
L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §92-31; am L 2005, c 177, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next